Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2201
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-2201 to 38-2238 shall be known and may be cited as the Nurse Practice Act.

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 523, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 757;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 67.